Massachusetts, session 194th, H2989.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Barnstable county
retirement board shall permit Wayne Taylor, a member of the Barnstable county retirement
system, to purchase creditable service for his Select Person time pursuant to paragraph (a) of
subdivision (1) of section 4 of chapter 32 of the General Laws.
of 1